District of Columbia statutes.
49-313

Discharge of commissioned officer.

(a)

A commissioned officer may be honorably discharged:

(1)

Upon tender of resignation;

(2)

Upon disbandment of the organization to which he belongs; or

(3)

Upon report of a board of examination, or for failure to appear before such board when ordered.

(b)

He may be dismissed upon the sentence of a court-martial, or conviction in a court of justice of an infamous offense.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 775, ch. 328, § 24
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 631, ch. 146, § 21
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 41(b), 46 DCR 2118
1981 Ed., § 39-313.
1973 Ed., § 39-214.